en: Dried dates, Dried date pulp and peel
da: Tørrede dadler
de: Getrocknete Datteln
fr: Datte pulpe et peau sèche
ml: കാരക്ക
sv: Torkade dadlar

en: Frozen dates
da: Frosne dadler
sv: Frysta dadlar

en: Deglet Noor dates
da: Deglet Noor-dadler
de: Deglet Nour Datteln
fr: Dattes Deglet Nour
hr: Deglet noor datulje
it: Datteri Deglet Noor
nl: Deglet Noor dadels
sv: Deglet Noor dadlar

en: Medjool dates, Dates (Medjool)
da: Medjool-dadler
de: Medjool Datteln
fr: Dattes Medjool, dates medjool
hr: Medjool datulje
it: Datteri Medjoul, Datteri Medjool
nl: Medjoul dadels
sv: Medjool dadlar

en: Mazafati dates
bg: Фурми Мазафати
da: Mazafati-dadler
de: Mazafati Datteln
fr: Dattes Mazafati
hr: Mazafati datulje
nl: Mazafati dadels
sv: Mazafati dadlar

en: Dried apples
de: getrocknete Apfel, gedörrte Apfel
es: Manzanas deshidratadas, Manzana deshidratada, Rodajas de manzana deshidratada
fi: Kuivatut omenat
fr: Pommes séchées
hr: Sušene jabuke
it: Mele secche
lt: Džiovinti obuoliai
nl: Gedroogde appels
ru: Яблоки сушёные, сушёные яблоки

en: Dried apricots
bg: Сушени кайсии
de: getrocknete Aprikosen, gedörrte Aprikosen
es: Albaricoques deshidratados, Orejones de albaricoque, Albaricoques desecados
fi: kuivatut aprikoosit
fr: Abricots secs, abricot sec, abricot séché, abricots séchés
hr: Suhe marelice
it: Albicocche secche
lt: Džiovinti abrikosai
nl: Gedroogde abrikozen
pl: Suszone morele
pt: Alperces desidratados
ru: Абрикосы сушёные, курага, сушёные абрикосы
tr: Kuru kayısı

en: Pitted dried apricots
fr: Abricots dénoyautés secs
hr: Suhe marelice bez koštice
lt: Džiovinti abrikosai be kauliukų
nl: Gedroogde ontpitte abrikozen

en: Dried bananas
de: getrocknete Bananen, gedörrte Bananen
es: Plátanos deshidratados, Bananas deshidratadas
fr: Bananes séchées
hr: Sušene banane
it: Banana essiccata
lt: Džiovinti bananai
nl: Gedroogde bananen
ru: Бананы сушёные, сушёные бананы

en: Dried raspberries
fr: Framboises séchées

en: Dried strawberries
bg: Сушени ягоди
fr: Fraises séchées
hr: Suhe jagode
lt: Džiovintos braškės

en: Dried bilberries
de: getrocknete Heidelbeeren, gedörrte Heidelbeeren
es: Arándanos deshidratados
fi: Kuivatut mustikat
fr: Myrtilles séchées
hr: Suhe borovnice
lt: Džiovintos šilauogės
nl: Gedroogde bosbessen

en: Dried cranberries
bg: Сушени червени боровинки
de: Getrocknete Moosbeere
es: Arándanos secos
fi: kuivatut karpalot
fr: Canneberges séchées, Cranberries séchées
hr: Sušene brusnice
it: Ossicocchi secchi
lt: Džiovintos spanguolės
nl: Gedroogde cranberries
pl: żurawina suszona

en: Dried mulberries
fr: Mûres blanches séchées
hr: Suhe dudove
lt: Džiovintos šilkmedžio uogos

en: Dried coconuts, Dried coconut
de: getrocknete Kokosnuss, gedörrte Kokosnuss
es: Coco deshidratado
fi: Kuivattu kookospähkinä
fr: Noix de coco sèches
hr: Sušeni kokos
it: Cocco disidratato
lt: Džiovintas kokosas
nl: Gedroogde kokos

en: Dried coconut chips
es: Coco deshidratado en trozos, Chips de coco
fr: Chips de noix de coco séchée
hr: Osušeni čips od kokosa
lt: Džiovintos kokoso drožlės
nl: Gedroogde kokoschips

en: Dried coconut flours, Dried coconut flour
bg: Кокосово брашно
de: Kokosmehl
es: Harina de coco
fr: Farines de noix de coco, farines de noix de coco, farine de coco, Farine de noix de coco séchée
hr: Sušeno kokosovo brašno
it: Farina di cocco
lt: Džiovinti kokosų miltai
nl: Gedroogde kokosmelen

en: Dried figs, Dried fig
de: getrocknete Feigen, gedörrte Feigen
es: Higos secos
fi: kuivatut viikunat
fr: Figues sèches, Figue sèche
hr: Suhe smokve
it: Fichi secchi
lt: Džiovintos figos
nl: Gedroogde vijgen
pl: Suszone figi
pt: Figos secos
ru: Инжир сушёный, сушёные инжир

en: Dried goji, Dried goji berries, Goji
de: Getrocknete Goji-Beeren
fi: kuivatut goji-marjat
fr: Baies de goji séchées, Baies de goji
hr: Sušeni goji
it: Bacche di goji secche
lt: Džiovintos goji uogos
nl: Gedroogde goji bessen
pl: Jagody goji suszone

en: Dried golden berries
fr: Physalis séchées, baies de physalis séchées